apertium-dan-nor.nno.dix
<pardef n="k/unne__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>unna</l>  <r>unne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>unna</l>  <r>unne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>unna</l>  <r>unne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>unna</l>  <r>unne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>unnande</l><r>unne<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>unn</l><r>unne</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>unnast</l><r>unne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>unna</l>  <r>unne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>an</l>    <r>unne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>unne</l>  <r>unne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sk/ulle__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>ulla</l>  <r>ulle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ulla</l>  <r>ulle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ulla</l>  <r>ulle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ulla</l>  <r>ulle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ullande</l><r>ulle<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>ull</l><r>ulle</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ullast</l><r>ulle<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ulla</l>  <r>ulle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>al</l>    <r>ulle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ulle</l>  <r>ulle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="vil/je__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>ja</l>    <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ja</l>    <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ja</l>    <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ja</l>    <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>jande</l> <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>j</l><r>je</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>jast</l>  <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ja</l>    <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>de</l>    <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>le</l>    <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Lexical verbs -->
<pardef n="vil/le__vblex_adj">
<e r="LR"><p><l>la</l>    <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>la</l>    <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>la</l>    <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>la</l>    <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>lande</l> <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>l</l>     <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>la</l>    <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>le</l>    <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>l</l><r>le</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>last</l>  <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>la</l>    <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>     <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>lar</l>   <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ler</l>   <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>lte</l>   <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>la</l>    <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<!-- setje; set -->
<pardef n="set/je__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>jande</l> <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l></l>      <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>     <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>j</l>     <r>je</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>     <r>je</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>jast</l>  <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>tast</l>  <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>     <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ter</l>   <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>     <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<!-- vite; v -->
<pardef n="v/ite__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>isst</l>       <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>isst</l>       <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>isste</l>      <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>isste</l>      <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>itande</l>     <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r>ite</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>et</l>        <r>ite</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>itast</l>     <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>isst</l>      <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>eit</l>       <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>isste</l>     <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="setje">           <i>set</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="føresetje">       <i>føreset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="fortsetje">       <i>fortset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="motsetje">        <i>motset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="folkesetje">      <i>folkeset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="omsetje">         <i>omset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="busetje">         <i>buset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilsetje">        <i>tilset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="utsetje">         <i>utset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="avsetje">         <i>avset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bortsetje">       <i>bortset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bisetje">         <i>biset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="dagsetje">        <i>dagset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="dokksetje">       <i>dokkset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forsetje">        <i>forset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="innsetje">        <i>innset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="irettesetje">     <i>iretteset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="knesetje">        <i>kneset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kringsetje">      <i>kringset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="landsetje">       <i>landset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="pantsetje">       <i>pantset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="sjøsetje">        <i>sjøset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skråsetje">       <i>skråset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skyldsetje">      <i>skyldset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="steinsetje">      <i>steinset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="stålsetje">       <i>stålset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="sysselsetje">     <i>sysselset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tonesetje">       <i>toneset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="verdsetje">       <i>verdset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kverrsetje">      <i>kverrset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bannsetje">       <i>bannset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bannsetje">       <i>bannset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="fastsetje">       <i>fastset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="framsetje">       <i>framset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="iverksetje">      <i>iverkset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="setje i verk">    <i>set</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/><p><l><b/>i<b/>verk</l><r><g><b/>i<b/>verk</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="setje fast">    <i>set</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/><p><l><b/>fast</l><r><g><b/>fast</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="setje fram">    <i>set</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/><p><l><b/>fram</l><r><g><b/>fram</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="istandsetje">     <i>istandset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="setje i stand">    <i>set</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/><p><l><b/>i<b/>stand</l><r><g><b/>i<b/>stand</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="besetje">         <i>beset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gjeninnsetje">    <i>gjeninnset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="grunnsetje">      <i>grunnset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="hensetje">        <i>henset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="hitsetje">        <i>hitset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="igangsetje">      <i>igangset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="ikraftsetje">     <i>ikraftset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="iscenesetje">     <i>isceneset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="lyssetje">        <i>lysset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="nedsetje">        <i>nedset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="oppsetje">        <i>oppset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="samansetje">      <i>samanset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="smaksetje">       <i>smakset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilsidesetje">    <i>tilsideset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tvangsinnsetje">  <i>tvangsinnset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="unnsetje">        <i>unnset</i><par n="set/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skulle">          <i>sk</i><par n="sk/ulle__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kunne">           <i>k</i><par n="k/unne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="ville">           <i>vil</i><par n="vil/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="vilje">           <i>vil</i><par n="vil/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="vite">            <i>v</i><par n="v/ite__vblex_adj"/></e>
